src/adv-sme-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

LEXICON LAGAadv 
 :laga adv ; 
+Err/Sub:lága adv ; 

LEXICON LAGAIDadv
 :lagajd9 adv ; 
+Err/Sub:lágajd9 adv ; 

LEXICON LEBBUIplc
 :lebbui adv-plc-comp ;
+Err/Sub:leabbui adv-plc-comp ;


LEXICON LEAPPOSplc
 :leappos adv-plc-comp ;
+Err/Sub:leabbos adv-plc-comp ;
+Err/Sub:leabbus adv-plc-comp ;

LEXICON gadv ! adv that can form compounds
+Adv:%> R ;
adv ;

LEXICON gadv-plc ! adv that can form compounds
+Adv+Sem/Plc:%> R ;
adv-plc ;


LEXICON adv
+Adv: K ;

LEXICON adv-plc
+Adv+Sem/Plc: K ;

LEXICON adv-time
+Adv+Sem/Time: K ;

LEXICON adv-time-plc
+Adv+Sem/Plc: K ;
+Adv+Sem/Time: K ;


!LEXICON multiadv ! dan_dihte
!+Adv+MWE: K-ge ;  

LEXICON CSadv
+Adv: # ;


LEXICON adv-comp
+Adv+Comp: K ;

LEXICON adv-sup
+Adv+Superl: K ;

LEXICON adv-plc-comp
+Adv+Sem/Plc+Comp: K ;

LEXICON adv-plc-sup
+Adv+Sem/Plc+Superl: K ;


LEXICON adv-time-comp
+Adv+Sem/Time+Comp: K ;

LEXICON adv-time-sup
+Adv+Sem/Time+Superl: K ;


LEXICON COMPADV
:%>t adv ;

LEXICON plc-SUPADVmus
:%>mus adv-plc-sup ;

LEXICON plc-SUPADVmusj
:%>muš adv-plc-sup ;

LEXICON Adverb
ovdamearkka% dihte:ovda#mearkka% dihte adv ;
guoktásiid% guoktásiid:guoktásiid% guoktásijd9 adv ;
giđđaláhkai+Err/Sub:giđđa#láhkái adv; !
alddage:alddage CSadv ;
allelii:allelii adv-plc ;
almmatge:almmatge CSadv ;
altteson:altteson CSadv ;
badjelabbui:badjelabbui adv-plc-comp ;
badjelaččas:badjelaččas adv-plc-comp ;
badjeleamos:badjeleamos adv-plc-sup ;
badjeleappos:badje LEAPPOSplc ;
skábmaleappos+Err/Sub:skábmaleabbus adv-time-comp ;
skábmaleappos:skábmaleappos adv-time-comp ;
badjelebbui:badje LEBBUIplc ;
baholaga:baho LAGAadv ;
baholagaid:baho LAGAIDadv ;
iđitbeallai:iđit#beallai adv-time ;
bajás% guvlui+Err/Sub:bajás#guvlui adv-plc; !
beallestákkus:bealle#stákkus adv ;
beavddibuidda:beavddibuidda adv-plc-comp ;
beavddimusas:beavddimusas adv-plc-sup ;
beavddimussii:beavddimussii adv-plc-sup ;
beavdelaččas:beavdelaččas adv-plc-comp ;
beavdeleappos:beavde LEAPPOSplc ;
beavdelebbui:beavde LEBBUIplc ;
biđgolaga:biđgo LAGAadv ;
biđgolagaid:biđgo LAGAIDadv ;
boaššoleappos:boaššo LEAPPOSplc ;
boaššolebbui:boaššo LEBBUIplc ;
botnibus:botnibus adv-plc ;
buotrat:buotrat CSadv ;
bál-bálddalaga:bál-báldda LAGAadv ;
bál-bálddalagaid:bál-báldda LAGAIDadv ;
bálddas:bálddas adv ;
bárralaga:bárra LAGAadv ;
bárralagaid:bárra LAGAIDadv ;
dalán:dalán adv-time ;
davveleappos:davve LEAPPOSplc ;
davvelebbui:davve LEBBUIplc ;
davábeallai:davá#beallai adv-plc ;
dađibahábut:dađi#bahábut adv-comp ;
dehal:dehal CSadv ;
dieppe:dieppe gadv-plc ;
dieppimus:dieppi plc-SUPADVmus ; !plc
dieppimustá:dieppimustá adv-plc-sup ;
dieppimuš:dieppi plc-SUPADVmusj ; !plc
dieppit:dieppi COMPADV ;  !plc
boahtte% jagi:boahtte#jagi adv-time ;
divvosupmái:divvosupmái adv ;
do-doppe:do-doppe adv-plc ;
dobbeleappos:dobbe LEAPPOSplc ;
dobbelebbui:dobbe LEBBUIplc ;
dolin:dolin adv-time ;
doppe:doppe gadv-plc ; 
doppimus:doppi plc-SUPADVmus ; !plc
doppimustá:doppimustá adv-plc-sup ;
doppimuš:doppi plc-SUPADVmusj ;!plc
doppit:doppi COMPADV ;!plc
duoge:duoge adv-plc ;
duohttáge:duohttáge CSadv ;
duoppe:duoppe gadv-plc ; !plc
duoppimus:duoppi plc-SUPADVmus ; !plc
duoppimustá:duoppimustá adv-plc-sup ;
duoppimuš:duoppi plc-SUPADVmusj ; !adv-plc
duoppit:duoppi COMPADV ;!adv-plc
dábbeleappos:dábbe LEAPPOSplc ;
dábbelebbui:dábbe LEBBUIplc ;
dále:dále adv-time ;
dálveleappos:dálveleappos adv-time-comp ;
dálvelebbui:dálvelebbui adv-time-comp ;
dáppe:dáppe gadv-plc ; !adv-plc
dáppibuidda:dáppibuidda adv-plc ;
dáppimus:dáppi plc-SUPADVmus ; !adv-plc
dáppimustá:dáppimustá adv-plc-sup ;
dáppimuš:dáppi plc-SUPADVmusj ; !adv-plc
dáppit:dáppi COMPADV ; !adv-plc
eahkes:eahkes adv-time ;
eahpedássálaga:eahpe#dássá LAGAadv ;
eahpedássálagaid:eahpe#dássá LAGAIDadv ;
eanebu:eanebu adv ;
eanebuš:eanebuš adv-comp ;
eisege:eisege CSadv ;
farggamušat:farggamušat adv-sup ;
fávleleappos:fávle LEAPPOSplc ;
fávlelebbui:fávle LEBBUIplc ;
fávllimus:fávllimus adv-plc-sup ;
galmmas:galmmas adv ;
gazzalaga:gazza LAGAadv ;
gazzalagaid:gazza LAGAIDadv ;
geahčen:geahčen adv-time ;
gáhttaráigge:gáhtta#ráigge adv-plc ;
geasseleappos:geasseleappos adv-time-comp ;
geasselebbui:geasselebbui adv-time-comp ;
gilgalagaid:gilga LAGAIDadv ;
gilvolaga:gilvo LAGAadv ;
goabbasisge:goabbasisge CSadv ;
goabbelisge:goabbelisge CSadv ;
goappilge:goappilge CSadv ;
goasii:goasii adv ;
gokkonai:gokkonai CSadv ;
guhkebuš:guhkebuš adv-time-comp ;
guhkibui:guhkibui adv-time ;
guhkkeleappos:guhkke LEAPPOSplc ;
guhkkelebbui:guhkke LEBBUIplc ;
guhkkelebbui+Err/Sub:guhki LEBBUIplc ;
guhkkelebbui+Err/Sub:guhkki LEBBUIplc ;
guhkkálagaid:guhkká LAGAIDadv ;
guhkásgo:guhkásgo CSadv ; ! Deviant,  !adv-plc
gullolaga:gullo LAGAadv ;
guovdeleappos:guovde LEAPPOSplc ;
guovdoleappos:guovdo LEAPPOSplc ;
guovdolebbui:guovdo LEBBUIplc ;
gáddelačča:gáddelačča adv-plc ;
gáddeleappos:gádde LEAPPOSplc ;
gárragii:gárragii adv ;
háŋkalagaid:háŋka LAGAIDadv ;
ijatbeaivvi:ijat#beaivvi adv-time ;
ildása:ildása adv ;
jitnosabbot:jitnosabbot adv-comp ;
jitnosepmosit:jitnosepmosit adv-sup ;
joavkolaga:joavko LAGAadv ;
jogo:jogo CSadv ;
jođáneappot:jođáneappot adv-comp ;
lahkosis+Err/Sub:láhkosis adv; !
latnjalagaid:latnja LAGAIDadv ;
loahpageahčen:loahpa#geahčen adv-time ;
lotnolaga:lotno LAGAadv ;
lullegeažis:lulle#geažis adv-plc ;
lullelačča:lullelačča adv-plc-comp ;
lulleleappos:lulle LEAPPOSplc ;
lullelebbui:lulle LEBBUIplc ;
luvvolagaid:luvvo LAGAIDadv ;
láhkai+Err/Sub:lahkái adv ; !part, po
lávgalaga:lávga LAGAadv ;
mallosge:mallosge CSadv ;
maŋimussii+Err/Sub:manjimussii adv-time ;
maŋimus:maŋimus adv-time-sup ;
maŋimusas:maŋimusas adv-time ;
maŋimustá:maŋimustá adv-time-sup ;
maŋimuštá:maŋimuštá adv-time-sup ;
maŋŋelaččas:maŋŋelaččas adv-time ;
maŋŋeleppožis:maŋŋeleppožis adv-time ;
maŋŋemaŋŋálaga:maŋŋe#maŋŋá LAGAadv ;
maŋŋemaŋŋálagaid:maŋŋe#maŋŋá LAGAIDadv ;
maŋŋá+Err/Sub:máŋŋá adv-time ;
meahcabeale:meahca#beale adv-plc ;
miehtá:miehtá adv-time-plc ;
mielastepmosit:mielastepmosit adv-sup ;
milloseappot:milloseappot adv-comp ;
moarseš:moarseš adv ;
moktige:moktige CSadv ;
máddelaččas:máddelaččas adv-plc-comp ;
máddil:máddil adv-plc ;
nabason:nabason CSadv ;
njoazebut:njoazebut adv-comp ;
nu% láhkai+Err/Sub:nu#láhkai adv ;
nuortaleappos:nuorta LEAPPOSplc ;
nuortalebbui:nuorta LEBBUIplc ;
nuortalis:nuortalis adv-plc ;
nuortalit:nuortalit adv-plc-comp ;
oalil:oalil adv ;
oanehaš:oanehaš adv-time ;
oarjelaččas:oarjelaččas adv-plc-comp ;
oarjin:oarjin adv-plc ;
oassálaga:oassá LAGAadv ;
oassálagaid:oassá LAGAIDadv ;
oktiige:oktiige CSadv ;
olggubus:olggubus adv-plc ;
olgolačča:olgolačča adv-plc-comp ;
olgoleappos:olgo LEAPPOSplc ;
olgolebbui:olgo LEBBUIplc ;
ovdalažžii:ovdalažžii adv-time ;
ovddemus:ovddemus adv-time-sup ;
ovddemusas:ovddemusas adv-time-sup ;
ovddemusat:ovddemusat adv-time-sup ;
ovddemussii:ovddemussii adv-time-sup ;
ovddemustá:ovddemustá adv-time-sup ;
ovddimus:ovddimus adv-time-sup ;
ovddimustá:ovddimustá adv-time-sup ;
rastá:rastá gadv-plc ;!adv-plc
ravdalačča:ravdalačča adv-plc-comp ;
ravdaleamos:ravdaleamos adv-plc ;
riddolačča:riddolačča adv-plc-comp ;
riddoleappos:riddo LEAPPOSplc ;
riddolebbui:riddo LEBBUIplc ;
rádjálaga:rádjá LAGAadv ;
rádjálagaid:rádjá LAGAIDadv ;
seahkesearválaga:seahke#searvá LAGAadv ;
seahkesearválagaid:seahke#searvá LAGAIDadv ;
seaidnelačča:seaidnelačča adv-plc-comp ;
seamma% ládje+Err/Sub:seammá#ládje adv;  !
sierra:sierra gadv ;
sierralagaid:sierra LAGAIDadv ;
siidolaga:siido LAGAadv ;
siskeleappos:siske LEAPPOSplc ;
siskelebbui:siske LEBBUIplc ;
siskkabeale:siskka#beale adv-plc ;
skuibut:skuibut adv-comp ;
soggelačča:soggelačča adv-plc-comp ;
sullalagaid:sulla LAGAIDadv ;
suvdálaga:suvdá LAGAadv ;
uhcimus:uhcimus adv-sup ;
uhcimusge:uhcimusge CSadv ;
uhcimustá:uhcimustá adv-sup ;
uhcit+Err/Sub:uhccit adv-comp ;
uksalačča:uksalačča adv-plc-comp ;
uksaleappos:uksa LEAPPOSplc ;
uksalebbui:uksa LEBBUIplc ;
unnimusat:unnimusat adv-sup ;
uskelačča:uskelačča adv-plc-comp ;
vahkkobotta:vahkko#botta adv-time ;
veahkkálagaid:veahkká LAGAIDadv ;
veastalabbos:veastalabbos adv-plc-comp ;
veastalačča:veastalačča adv-plc-comp ;
viidáseappot+Err/Sub:vijdáseppot adv-comp ; !
viidásit:viidásit adv-comp ;
vulobeale:vulo#beale adv-plc ;
vuohkkasit:vuohkkasit adv ;
vuolibuš:vuolibuš adv-plc-comp ;
vuolimus:vuolimus adv-plc-sup ;
vuolleleappos:vuolle LEAPPOSplc ;
vuollelebbui:vuolle LEBBUIplc ;
vuollálaga:vuollá LAGAadv ;
vuosttamustá:vuosttamustá adv-sup ;
vuotnalaččas:vuotnalaččas adv-plc-comp ;
várreleappos:várre LEAPPOSplc ;
várrelebbui:várre LEBBUIplc ;
várrelis:várrelis adv-plc ;
álggage:álggage CSadv ;
árabuš:árabuš adv-time-comp ;
čeahpálaga:čeahpá LAGAadv ;
čeahpálagaid:čeahpá LAGAIDadv ;
álggogeahčen:álggo#geahčen adv-time ;
vuđoleappot adv-comp ;
álkimusat adv-sup ;
bahábut adv-comp ;
bahás adv ;
buoremusat adv-sup ;
siivomusat adv-sup ;
siivvubut adv-comp ;
vearrámusat adv-sup ;
vuolimusas adv-sup ;
bajimusas adv-sup ;
bajimussii adv-sup ;
sakkabut adv-comp ;
stuorimusat adv-sup ;
eanemustá adv-sup ;
eambbo:eambo adv-comp ;
hárvvit adv-comp ;
rievttamus adv-sup ;
árabut adv-comp ;
guhkimus adv-sup ;
dávjjibut adv-comp ;
dávjjimus adv-sup ;
